Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-191
Discontinuance of district; obligations incurred after April 8, 1903; subject to redemption upon discontinuance.

In all cases where bonds and other obligations of irrigation districts were issued after April 8, 1903, such bonds and obligations shall become subject to redemption by the board of directors of any irrigation district, as soon as the property and franchise of such district shall be sold after such district has elected to discontinue as a district, as herein provided.

Laws 1903, c. 123, § 1, p. 629;

R.S.1913, § 3521;

C.S.1922, § 2921;

C.S.1929, § 46-166;

R.S.1943, § 46-191.